Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103.03
Open account with officer; how treated.

(1) An open account established for the benefit of any governing body with a business in which an officer has an interest shall be deemed a contract subject to sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.06.

(2) The statement required to be filed by section 49-14,103.02 shall be filed within ten days after such account is opened. Thereafter, the person charged with keeping records for such governing body shall maintain a running account of amounts purchased on the open account.

(3) Purchases made from petty cash or a petty cash fund shall not be subject to sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.06.

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 50.